Washington statutes.
RCW 19.94.220

Investigations.

In promoting the general objective of ensuring accuracy of weighing or measuring instruments or devices and the proper representation of weights and measures in commercial transactions, the director or a city sealer shall, upon his or her own initiative and as he or she deems appropriate and advisable, investigate complaints made concerning violations of the provisions of this chapter.

[ 1992 c 237 s 13; 1991 sp.s. c 23 s 8; 1969 c 67 s 22.]

NOTES:

Legislative findings—Intent—1991 sp.s. c 23: See notes following RCW 19.94.150.